test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns.

Tests:
  Noun - alkohåvllagássjelisvuohta: # MUORRA SgNom
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuohta, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuohta]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Gen: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuoda, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuoda]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Acc: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodav, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodav]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ine: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodan, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodan]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ill: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuohtaj, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuohtaj]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ela: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodas, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodas]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Com: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajn, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajn]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Nom: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuoda, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuoda]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Gen: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodaj, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodaj]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Acc: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajt, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajt]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ine: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajn, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajn]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ill: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajda, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajda]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ela: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajs, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajs]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Com: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodaj, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodaj]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Ess: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuohtan, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuohtan]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Abe: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodadak, alkohåvllågássjelisvuodada, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodadak, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodada]

  Noun - juogosgirjje: # MUORRA SgNom
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Nom: [juogosgirjje, juogos-girjje]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Gen: [juogosgirje, juogos-girje]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Acc: [juogosgirjev, juogos-girjev]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ine: [juogosgirjen, juogos-girjen]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ill: [juogosgirjjáj, juogos-girjjáj]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ela: [juogosgirjes, juogos-girjes]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Com: [juogosgirjijn, juogos-girjijn]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Nom: [juogosgirje, juogos-girje]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Gen: [juogosgirjij, juogos-girjij]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Acc: [juogosgirjijt, juogos-girjijt]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ine: [juogosgirjijn, juogos-girjijn]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ill: [juogosgirjijda, juogos-girjijda]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ela: [juogosgirjijs, juogos-girjijs]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Com: [juogosgirjij, juogos-girjij]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Ess: [juogosgirjjen, juogos-girjjen]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juogosgirjásj, juogos-girjásj]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juogosgirjátjasj, juogos-girjátjasj]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: [juogosgirjedibme, juogos-girjedibme]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [juogosgirjálasj, juogos-girjálasj]
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Abe: [juogosgirjedak, juogosgirjeda, juogos-girjedak, juogos-girjeda]

  Noun - bijllajuogos: # ÅRES SgNom
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Nom: [bijllajuogos, bijlla-juogos]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Gen: [bijllajuohkusa, bijlla-juohkusa]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Acc: [bijllajuohkusav, bijlla-juohkusav]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ine: [bijllajuohkusin, bijlla-juohkusin]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ill: [bijllajuohkusij, bijlla-juohkusij]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ela: [bijllajuohkusis, bijlla-juohkusis]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Com: [bijllajuohkusijn, bijlla-juohkusijn]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Nom: [bijllajuohkusa, bijlla-juohkusa]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Gen: [bijllajuohkusij, bijlla-juohkusij]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Acc: [bijllajuohkusijt, bijlla-juohkusijt]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ine: [bijllajuohkusijn, bijlla-juohkusijn]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ill: [bijllajuohkusijda, bijlla-juohkusijda]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ela: [bijllajuohkusijs, bijlla-juohkusijs]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Com: [bijllajuohkusij, bijlla-juohkusij]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Ess: [bijllajuohkusin, bijllajuogon, bijlla-juohkusin, bijlla-juogon] #To Inga it's strange with short essive, we don't use it much in Tysfjord, but documented in grammars
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [bijllajuohkusasj, bijlla-juohkusasj]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [bijllajuohkusattjasj, bijlla-juohkusattjasj]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [bijllajuohkusahtes, bijlla-juohkusahtes]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Pl+Nom: [bijllajuohkusahttá, bijllajuohkusahttása, bijlla-juohkusahttá, bijlla-juohkusahttása]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Ill: [bijllajuohkusahttáj, bijllajuohkusahttásij, bijlla-juohkusahttáj, bijlla-juohkusahttásij]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Abe: [bijllajuohkusahtá, bijllajuohkusahti, bijlla-juohkusahtá, bijlla-juohkusahti]

  Noun - giedjeklihtte: # MUORRA SgNom
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: [giedjeklihtte, giedjek-lihtte]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: [giedjeklihten, giedjek-lihten]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: [giedjeklihttáj, giedjek-lihttáj]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [giedjeklihtásj, giedjek-lihtásj]

  Noun - giedjegalihtte: # MUORRA SgGen
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: [giedjegalihtte, giedjega-lihtte]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: [giedjegalihten, giedjega-lihten]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: [giedjegalihttáj, giedjega-lihttáj]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [giedjegalihtásj, giedjega-lihtásj]

  Noun - giedjegijlihtte: # MUORRA PlGen
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: [giedjegijlihtte, giedjegij-lihtte]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: [giedjegijlihten, giedjegij-lihten]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: [giedjegijlihttáj, giedjegij-lihttáj]
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [giedjegijlihtásj, giedjegij-lihtásj]

  Noun -ednamdille: # NOADE
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [ednamdille, ednam-dille]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: [ednamdile, ednam-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [ednamdiláma, ednam-diláma]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: [ednamdilev, ednam-dilev]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [ednamdilen, ednam-dilen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [ednamdilláj, ednam-dilláj]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: [ednamdiles, ednam-diles]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: [ednamdilijn, ednam-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: [ednamdile, ednam-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: [ednamdilij, ednam-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: [ednamdilijt, ednam-dilijt]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: [ednamdilijn, ednam-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: [ednamdilijda, ednam-dilijda]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: [ednamdilijs, ednam-dilijs]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: [ednamdilij, ednam-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: [ednamdillen, ednam-dillen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [ednamdilásj, ednam-dilásj]

  Noun - ednamadille: # MUORRA
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [ednamadille, ednama-dille]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: [ednamadile, ednama-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [ednamadiláma, ednama-diláma]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: [ednamadilev, ednama-dilev]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [ednamadilen, ednama-dilen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [ednamadilláj, ednama-dilláj]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: [ednamadiles, ednama-diles]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: [ednamadilijn, ednama-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: [ednamadile, ednama-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: [ednamadilij, ednama-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: [ednamadilijt, ednama-dilijt]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: [ednamadilijn, ednama-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: [ednamadilijda, ednama-dilijda]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: [ednamadilijs, ednama-dilijs]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: [ednamadilij, ednama-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: [ednamadillen, ednama-dillen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [ednamadilásj, ednama-dilásj]

  Noun - ednamijdille: # MUORRA
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [ednamijdille, ednamij-dille]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: [ednamijdile, ednamij-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [ednamijdiláma, ednamij-diláma]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: [ednamijdilev, ednamij-dilev]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [ednamijdilen, ednamij-dilen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [ednamijdilláj, ednamij-dilláj]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: [ednamijdiles, ednamij-diles]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: [ednamijdilijn, ednamij-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: [ednamijdile, ednamij-dile]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: [ednamijdilij, ednamij-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: [ednamijdilijt, ednamij-dilijt]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: [ednamijdilijn, ednamij-dilijn]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: [ednamijdilijda, ednamij-dilijda]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: [ednamijdilijs, ednamij-dilijs]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: [ednamijdilij, ednamij-dilij]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: [ednamijdillen, ednamij-dillen]
    ednam+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [ednamijdilásj, ednamij-dilásj]
